nb: Fyllmateriale for isolering: Bomull; Dunblanding; Andedun; Fleece; Gåsedun; PrimaLoft; Syntetisk polyester; Thinsulate; Ull; Annet
en: Insulation fill material: Cotton; Down blend; Duck down; Fleece; Goose down; PrimaLoft; Synthetic polyester; Thinsulate; Wool; Other
it: Materiale isolante di imbottitura: Cotone; Misto piuma; Piuma d’anatra; Pile; Piuma d’oca; PrimaLoft; Poliestere sintetico; Thinsulate; Lana; Altro
th: วัสดุบุฉนวน: ฝ้าย; ขนเป็ด/ห่านผสม; ขนเป็ด; ฟลีซ; ขนห่าน; PrimaLoft; โพลีเอสเตอร์สังเคราะห์; Thinsulate; ขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 保温填充材质: 棉; 混合羽绒; 鸭绒; 抓绒; 鹅绒; PrimaLoft; 合成聚酯纤维; Thinsulate; 羊毛; 其他
da: Insulationsfyldemateriale: Bomuld; Dunblanding; Andedun; Fleece; Gåsedun; PrimaLoft; Syntetisk polyester; Thinsulate; Uld; Andet
hr-HR: Materijal toplinske izolacije: Pamuk; Mješavina paperja; Pačje paperje; Flis; Gusje paperje; PrimaLoft; Sintetički poliester; Thinsulate; Vuna; Ostalo
tr: Yalıtım dolgu malzemesi: Pamuk; Kuş tüyü karışımı; Ördek tüyü; Polar; Kaz tüyü; PrimaLoft; Sentetik polyester; Thinsulate; Yün; Diğer
cs: Izolační výplňový materiál: Bavlna; Směs prachového peří; Kachní peří; Fleece; Husí peří; PrimaLoft; Syntetický polyester; Thinsulate; Vlna; Jiné
zh-TW: 絕緣填充材質: 棉質; 羽絨混紡; 鴨絨; 刷毛; 鵝絨; PrimaLoft; 合成聚酯纖維; 新雪麗 (Thinsulate); 羊毛; 其他
sl-SI: Material izolacijskega polnila: Bombaž; Mešanica s puhom; Račji puh; Flis; Gosji puh; PrimaLoft; Sintetični poliester; Thinsulate; Volna; Drugo
pl: Izolacyjny materiał wypełniający: Bawełna; Mieszanka puchu; Puch kaczy; Polar; Puch gęsi; PrimaLoft; Poliester syntetyczny; Thinsulate; Wełna; Inny
sv: Isoleringsmaterial: Bomull; Dunblandning; Anddun; Fleece; Gåsdun; PrimaLoft; Syntetisk polyester; Thinsulate; Ull; Övrigt
vi: Chất liệu bông nhồi cách nhiệt: Bông; Lông vũ pha; Lông vịt; Vải lông cừu; Lông ngỗng; PrimaLoft; Polyester tổng hợp; Thinsulate; Len; Khác
fi: Eristyksen täytemateriaali: Puuvilla; Untuvasekoite; Ankanuntuva; Fleece; Hanhenuntuva; PrimaLoft; Synteettinen polyesteri; Thinsulate; Villa; Muu
el: Υλικό πλήρωσης μόνωσης: Βαμβάκι; Μείγμα πούπουλων; Πούπουλο πάπιας; Φλις (Fleece); Πούπουλο χήνας; PrimaLoft; Συνθετικός πολυεστέρας; Thinsulate; Μαλλί; Άλλο
fr: Matériau de remplissage isolant: Coton; Mélange de duvet; Duvet de canard; Polaire; Duvet d’oie; PrimaLoft; Polyester synthétique; Thinsulate; Laine; Autre
es: Material de relleno de aislamiento: Algodón; Mezcla de plumón; Plumón de pato; Forro polar; Plumón de ganso; PrimaLoft; Poliéster sintético; Thinsulate; Lana; Otro
ja: 断熱充填材: コットン; ダウンブレンド; ダックダウン; フリース; グースダウン; プリマロフト; 合成ポリエステル; シンサレート; ウール; その他
hu: Szigetelés töltőanyaga: Pamut; Pehelykeverék; Kacsapehely; Polár; Libapehely; PrimaLoft; Szintetikus poliészter; Thinsulate; Gyapjú; Egyéb
ro-RO: Material de umplutură pentru izolație: Bumbac; Amestec cu puf; Puf de rață; Fleece; Puf de gâscă; PrimaLoft; Poliester sintetic; Thinsulate; Lână; Altele
lt-LT: Izoliacinio užpildo medžiaga: Medvilnė; Pūkų mišinys; Ančių pūkai; Flysas; Žąsų pūkai; „PrimaLoft“; Sintetinis poliesteris; „Thinsulate“; Vilna; Kita
bg-BG: Материал на изолационния пълнеж: Памук; Смес от пух; Патешки пух; Полар; Гъши пух; PrimaLoft; Синтетичен полиестер; Thinsulate; Вълна; Други
nl: Isolatievulmateriaal: Katoen; Donsmix; Eendendons; Fleece; Ganzendons; PrimaLoft; Synthetisch polyester; Thinsulate; Wol; Overige
de: Füllmaterial der Dämmung: Baumwolle; Daunenmischung; Entendaunen; Fleece; Gänsedaunen; PrimaLoft; Synthetisches Polyester; Thinsulate; Wolle; Sonstige
sk-SK: Materiál izolačnej výplne: Bavlna; Zmes páperia; Kačacie páperie; Flís; Husacie páperie; PrimaLoft; Syntetický polyester; Thinsulate; Vlna; Iné
ru: Материал утеплителя: Хлопок; Пуховая смесь; Утиный пух; Флис; Гусиный пух; PrimaLoft; Синтетический полиэстер; Thinsulate; Шерсть; Другое
pt-PT: Material de enchimento isolante: Algodão; Mistura de penugem; Penugem de pato; Lã polar; Penugem de ganso; PrimaLoft; Poliéster sintético; Thinsulate; Lã; Outro
ko: 단열 충전재: 면; 다운 혼방; 덕 다운; 플리스; 구스 다운; PrimaLoft; 합성 폴리에스터; 신슐레이트; 울; 기타
pt-BR: Material de preenchimento isolante: Algodão; Mistura de plumas; Plumas de pato; Fleece; Plumas de ganso; PrimaLoft; Poliéster sintético; Thinsulate; Lã; Outro